Utah statutes.
58-60-502.   Definitions.

In addition to the definitions in Sections 58-1-102 and 58-60-102, as used in this part:

(1)  "Approved agency" means an agency licensed by the Department of Human Services or a general acute hospital or specialty hospital as defined in Section 26-21-2 and licensed by the state Department of Health that:

(a)  provides substance abuse services; and

(b)  provides qualified mental health therapists in sufficient number to evaluate the conditions of the clients being treated by counselors licensed under this part employed by the approved agency to ensure that appropriate substance abuse services are being given.

(2)  "Board" means the Substance Abuse Counselor Licensing Board created in Section 58-60-503.

(3)  "Direct supervision" means:

(a)  a supervisor provides a minimum of one hour of supervision to the licensed substance abuse counselor for every 40 hours of client care provided by the counselor, which supervision may include group supervision;

(b)  the supervision is conducted in a face-to-face manner, unless otherwise approved on a case-by-case basis by the division in collaboration with the board; and

(c)  a supervisor is available for consultation with the counselor at all times.

(4)  "General supervision" shall be defined by the division by rule.

(5)  "Group supervision" means more than one counselor licensed under this part meets with the supervisor at the same time.

(6)  "Individual supervision" means only one counselor licensed under this part meets with the supervisor at a given time.

(7) (a)  "Practice as a licensed substance abuse counselor" means providing services as an employee of an approved agency under the general supervision of a licensed mental health therapist, to individuals or groups of persons for conditions of substance abuse, consistent with the education and training of a licensed substance abuse counselor required under this part, and the standards and ethics of the profession as approved by the division in collaboration with the board, and includes:

(i)  administering the screening process by which a client is determined appropriate and eligible for admission to a particular program;

(ii)  conducting the administrative intake procedures for admission to a program;

(iii)  conducting orientation of a client, including:

(A)  describing the general nature and goals of the program;

(B)  explaining rules governing client conduct and infractions that can lead to disciplinary action or discharge from the program;

(C)  explaining hours during which services are available in a nonresidential program;

(D)  treatment costs to be borne by the client, if any; and

(E)  describing the client's rights as a program participant;

(iv)  conducting those assessment procedures by which a substance abuse counselor identifies an individual's strengths, weaknesses, problems, and needs for the development of the treatment plan;

(v)  participating in the process of treatment planning by which the substance abuse counselor, the mental health therapist, and the client:

(A)  identify and rank problems needing resolution;

(B)  establish agreed upon immediate and long term goals; and

(C)  decide on a treatment process and the resources to be utilized;

(vi)  providing substance abuse counseling services to alcohol and drug abuse clients and significant other persons in the client's life as part of a comprehensive treatment plan, including the following, but not including mental health therapy:

(A)  leading specific task-oriented groups, didactic groups, and group discussions;

(B)  cofacilitating group therapy with a licensed mental health therapist; and

(C)  engaging in one-on-one interventions and interactions coordinated and directly supervised by a mental health therapist;

(vii)  performing case management activities which bring services, agencies, resources, or people together within a planned framework of action toward the achievement of established goals, including, when appropriate, liaison activities and collateral contacts;

(viii)  providing substance abuse crisis intervention services;

(ix)  providing client education to individuals and groups concerning alcohol and other drug abuse, including identification and description of available treatment services and resources;

(x)  identifying the needs of the client that cannot be met by the substance abuse counselor or agency and referring the client to appropriate services and community resources;

(xi)  developing and providing effective reporting and recordkeeping procedures and services, which include charting the results of the assessment and treatment plan, writing reports, progress notes, discharge summaries, and other client-related data; and

(xii)  consulting with other professionals in regard to client treatment and services to assure comprehensive quality care for the client.

(b)  "Practice as a certified substance abuse counselor, certified substance abuse counselor intern, or certified substance abuse counselor extern" means providing the services described in Subsections (7)(a) and (b) under the direct supervision of a mental health therapist or licensed substance abuse counselor.

(c)  "Practice as a licensed substance abuse counselor" does not include:

(i)  the diagnosing of mental illness, including substance abuse, as defined in Section 58-60-102;

(ii)  engaging in the practice of mental health therapy as defined in Section 58-60-102; or

(iii)  the performance of a substance abuse diagnosis, any other mental illness diagnosis, or psychological testing.

(8)  "Program" means a residential or nonresidential program that provides substance abuse services.

(9)  "Substance abuse education program" means a formal program of substance abuse education offered by an accredited institution of higher education that meets standards established by the division by rule in collaboration with the board and includes a minimum of 300 hours of classroom education and a supervised field work practicum of at least 300 hours.

